Hawaii statutes.
[PART
IA.] MOTOR VEHICLE REGULATION

[§286-16] Powers and duties. The
director of transportation shall prescribe uniform standards and procedures for
motor vehicle inspection, driver licensing, and registration, including the
form and content of records to be maintained for the registration of vehicles
and for the licensing of drivers. [L Sp 1977 1st, c 20, pt of §8]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next